Missouri, session 2026, HB3112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 571, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 571.165, to read as follows:
571.165. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Law enforcement agency", the same meaning given to the term in section
590.1040;
(2) "Retired law enforcement identification card", an identification card issued
by a law enforcement agency to a retired officer for purposes of verifying the retired
officer's satisfaction of certain eligibility requirements to carry a concealed firearm in
accordance with 18 U.S.C. Section 926C;
(3) "Retired officer", any individual separated from service with a law
enforcement agency who meets the requirements of paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (5), and (7)
of subsection (c) of 18 U.S.C. Section 926C.
2. A law enforcement agency shall provide any retired officer with a retired law
enforcement identification card upon the payment of a fee of one hundred dollars.
3. A retired law enforcement identification card issued under this section shall
include at least the following:
(1) The photograph of the retired officer;
(2) The name, address, date of birth, and signature of the retired officer;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3112 2
(3) The name, telephone number, and address of the law enforcement agency
issuing the card;
(4) The following text: "This card does not authorize the holder to carry a
concealed firearm in accordance with 18 U.S.C. Section 926C unless accompanied by a
firearms qualification certification obtained within the most recent twelve-month period
that meets the requirements of 18 U.S.C. Section 926C.";
(5) The following text: "This card does not authorize the holder to carry a
concealed firearm while under the influence of alcohol or another intoxicating or
hallucinatory drug or substance.";
(6) The following text: "This card does not authorize the holder to act on the
named law enforcement agency's behalf or to exercise any law enforcement authority.";
and
(7) A statement that the card has an indefinite expiration date.
4. A law enforcement agency shall maintain a roster of its retired officers issued
law enforcement identification cards under this section.
5. A law enforcement agency shall reissue any lost retired law enforcement
identification card upon the payment of a fee of one hundred fifty dollars.
6. A law enforcement agency may, but shall not be required to, offer retired
officers the firearms training required to maintain the certification described in
subsection (c) of 18 U.S.C. Section 926C.
7. A law enforcement agency that collects any fees under this section shall use
the fees to conduct activities required or authorized under this section.
✔